inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_glossing.lexc
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>aangi%>b1an2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+1+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>ang #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>angi%>b1an2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>eg #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>egi%>b1an2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+2+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>siw%>am%>b1an2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>si%>gw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+4:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>si%>nid1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>si%>nip%>an2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>si%>p%>an2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+X:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>si%>nd1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+Neg+X+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Prt@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>si%>nd1i%>b1an2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+1+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>aan%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+1+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>ang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>angi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+2+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>eg%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>egi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+3+4+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1i%>nig%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+3+4+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1i%>nig%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+3+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>ag%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>ag%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+X+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>iing%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@+VTI+Cnj+X+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@U.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode.Dub@n%>%>c1%>%>aw4%>iingi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
